Tennessee, session 114, SB1395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-1305, is amended by deleting
the section in its entirety and substituting instead the following:
Grant payments under this part must be made to the individual monthly or
quarterly and forwarded to the person at the place of the individual's residence. Grant
payments are nonassignable and payable only to the individual or the individual's legally
authorized representative, which shall not be the nursing home.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1395
001589
- 1 -